src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.dic
abbarolu/BZa
abbelada/BZa
abbibadura/BZa
abbillu/EZ
abbirtiosu/EZ
abbissiosu/EZ
abbolicosu/DZ
abbotinada/BZa
abbretiosu/EZ
abbulotu/BZa
abbunzosu/EZ
abiana/BZa
acadhonadu/DZ
acalabiau/AZa
acarada/BZa
acarduradu/EZ
achietu/EZ
aciola/BZa
aciunta/CZa
aconcixedhu/DZ
acotzu/CZa
acriore/BZa
adderetada/BZa
addoru/AZa
addotziladu/DZ
afangada/BZa
afeladu/EZ
afoltunadu/EZ
afortunadu/EZ
afradhocu/EZ
afranzosu/DZ
afrusada/BZa
afussadu/EZ
aghervu/DZ
agitóriu/AZa
agritu/EZ
agritzu/EZ
aina/BZa
allacada/BZa
allambridu/EZ
allampainadu/DZ
allibberamentu/AZa
alluchitadedhu/DZ
allupada/BZa
altaradu/EZ
ammanta/CZa
ammarmoradu/DZ
amministrascione/AZa
ammodhicada/BZa
amplosu/EZ
amprosu/EZ
anarba/BZa
anchimannu/DZ
anedhu/CZa
animosu/EZ
annojadu/DZ
annorinedhu/AZa
ansile/BZa
antzianu/EZ
apetorizu/BZa
apijighedhadu/DZ
apóstulu/AZa
apretu/CZa
apuente/BZa
architetónicu/DZ
arrafitau/AZa
arraspiosu/DZ
arraxina/BZa
arretumbosu/DZ
arretzara/BZa
arringiolu/AZa
arrofianu/EZ
arruca/CZa
arrufianu/EZ
arrutu/DZ
arzillu/EZ
asciada/BZa
assazadore/AZa
àssidu/DZ
assuriu/EZ
asulu/EZ
asuridu/EZ
asuriu/EZ
atapada/BZa
atatu/EZ
aténdhiu/DZ
atinadu/EZ
atremenada/AZa
avariadu/DZ
avocadu/EZ
axedu/EZ
babera/AZa
bacheta/BZa
bachianu/EZ
bagadiu/EZ
baghianu/EZ
balba/CZa
balodru/EZ
balossu/EZ
bardufa/BZa
bargaminu/AZa
bàrriu/DZ
basciotu/EZ
bassotu/EZ
basu/CZa
bellitu/EZ
bentosu/EZ
beoledhu/AZa
beta/CZa
betada/BZa
beutu/DZ
biatzu/EZ
binu/CZa
birbantu/EZ
bísciu/AZa
bissosu/EZ
bíviu/DZ
bizada/BZa
bolu/CZa
bravàglia/AZa
brigonzosu/EZ
brincu/CZa
briosu/EZ
brofetosu/DZ
bufada/BZa
buinete/AZa
buza/CZa
cabidhudu/DZ
cabútzulu/AZa
cadena/BZa
caltolàriu/AZa
cannarzu/BZa
cantzamentu/AZa
capatzu/DZ
cara/CZa
carràschiu/AZa
casidhu/BZa
cavanata/AZa
certu/CZa
cheghente/EZ
chidarzu/DZ
chistioni/AZa
cima/CZa
cixiredha/AZa
cobeltura/BZa
codhànciu/DZ
comissu/AZa
connada/BZa
contu/CZa
contulalzu/EZ
contularzu/EZ
copudu/EZ
corazosu/EZ
corduanu/DZ
corrocau/AZa
corrudu/EZ
corzu/CZa
costumu/BZa
crepéntzia/AZa
crobecu/BZa
crocoledhu/DZ
cubbu/CZa
cuentu/AZa
culurjone/BZa
cumpletu/DZ
cuncordu/EZ
cunfidénscia/AZa
curiosu/EZ
daminzana/BZa
decídiu/DZ
deda/AZa
dente/CZa
difetosu/EZ
disatentu/DZ
discinida/AZa
dubbitosu/DZ
duendu/AZa
erba/CZa
erricu/EZ
espositóriu/AZa
facimannu/DZ
falada/BZa
fasche/CZa
faulalzu/EZ
faularzu/EZ
favularju/EZ
fenesta/AZa
féstinu/DZ
fiascu/BZa
fillu/CZa
fizu/CZa
foghilaja/AZa
fossa/CZa
fozudu/DZ
frabaxu/EZ
fraculada/BZa
frama/CZa
fremme/CZa
frigheta/AZa
fritza/CZa
frusca/BZa
frutu/CZa
fugaresu/DZ
furcone/AZa
fusu/CZag
fuzidorzu/BZa
galanu/EZ
gelda/CZa
gherme/CZa
ghertzu/DZ
ghetu/AZa
giambada/BZa
giunta/CZa
golostrarju/AZa
grassiosu/EZ
grusirarosu/DZ
gupeta/AZa
ifrota/CZa
iltzemu/DZ
imbassada/BZa
imbàulu/AZa
imboju/CZa
impacu/CZa
impintu/DZ
impobidhamentu/AZa
inchietu/EZ
inculdata/AZa
indaoriu/DZ
infelta/CZa
infrissida/BZa
ingudroniu/DZ
innaigadura/AZa
ipantu/CZa
iparraguatza/AZa
ipinosu/DZ
isalenu/BZa
isbàgliu/CJa
isbàidu/DZ
isbéntiu/AZa
iscavu/CZa
isciapete/AZa
isciumpiadu/DZ
iscortza/CZa
iscosidura/BZa
iscussertu/EZ
iselembrauda/AZa
isfaciu/DZ
isfrunza/CZa
ispabillu/EZ
ispera/CZa
isperraditu/DZ
ispinu/CZa
ispiru/AZa
ispudu/CZa
ispuntogliata/BZa
istalla/CZa
istelzu/CZa
istichiu/DZ
istiletu/AZa
istrobbu/CZa
iterratu/AZa
itzosu/DZ
labiolu/BZa
larva/CZa
legisladori/AZa
lepiedhu/EZ
leporinu/DZ
licanzu/EZ
licore/BZa
lítara/AZa
líticu/DZ
lizu/CZa
macacu/EZ
machisonzu/DZ
madre/AZa
maistru/EZ
malincreniu/DZ
malinnu/EZ
mandarinu/BZa
maniestu/AZa
mantza/CZa
marintintziunadu/DZ
maseru/EZ
massimista/AZa
meistu/BZa
mendhegosu/DZ
menga/CZa
merringhenga/AZa
minoredhu/EZ
minuju/EZ
minusu/EZ
mituledhu/DZ
molentada/AZa
montrigu/BZa
moriscu/EZ
mundhu/CZa
mungeta/AZa
muradu/DZ
murone/BZa
narau/AZa
nasu/CZa
nervosu/EZ
néutru/DZ
ninniada/BZa
obbilu/AZa
ogru/CZa
ominàrgiu/DZ
orolozu/BZa
orrogalla/AZa
ortiju/EZ
paltu/CZa
palumba/BZa
panischedha/AZa
papidhosu/DZ
pasturale/AZa
patata/BZa
pede/CZa
pesseri/AZa
petaresu/DZ
petenada/BZa
petra/CZa
pigadorza/BZa
pínniche/AZa
pintuledhu/DZ
pipiola/BZa
pisu/CZa
pitichedhu/EZ
pítzicu/AZa
pitzocu/EZ
poledhinu/DZ
possessu/BZa
prantadore/AZa
pratu/CZa
prepessone/BZa
príngiu/DZ
profilu/AZa
pruine/BZa
puda/CZa
pudhecu/BZa
pulmonatu/DZ
pupuza/AZa
pustialvu/BZa
putu/CZa
regagliosu/DZ
regiolamentu/AZa
reina/BZa
resa/CZa
risonedhu/AZa
romàticu/DZ
ruta/CZa
sachedhada/BZa
sardónicu/DZ
sarracu/BZa
scadra/AZa
sciumbesciadu/DZ
scova/CZa
segante/AZa
seratzu/BZa
serronudu/DZ
silinga/BZa
sinza/CZa
siscuru/EZ
sorca/AZa
sordatinu/DZ
sostre/CZa
spuntada/BZa
stadha/CZa
straminciosu/DZ
súciu/AZa
sugu/CZa
sutzosu/DZ
taba/BZa
taltu/CZa
terra/CZa
teularju/AZa
tidore/BZa
tirannu/DZ
tortu/CZa
tremata/BZa
trémidu/DZ
tremma/CZa
trèmmene/AZa
trucu/CZa
tumbu/CZa
tuvosu/DZ
tzelacuca/AZa
tzeracu/BZa
tzufu/CZa
ua/AZa
ungheresu/DZ
uricra/BZa
vajoni/AZa
vena/CZa
vogliadu/DZ
votu/CZa
zarrete/BZa
zubbu/CZa
